Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Health Care Facility-Provider Cooperation Act:

(1) Community planning means a plan which identifies (a) health-care-related resources, facilities, and services within the community, (b) the health care needs of the community, (c) gaps in services, (d) duplication of services, and (e) ways to meet health care needs;

(2) Cooperative agreement means an agreement among two or more health care facilities or other providers for the sharing, allocation, or referral of patients, personnel, instructional programs, equipment, support services and facilities, or medical, diagnostic, or laboratory facilities or procedures or other services traditionally offered or purchased by health care facilities or other providers;

(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(4) Health care facility means:

(a) Any facility required to be licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or, if in another state, licensed in such state; and

(b) Any parent of a health care facility, health care facility subsidiary, or health care facility affiliate that provides medical or medically related diagnostic and laboratory services or engages in ancillary activities supporting those services; and

(5) Provider means any person licensed to provide health care services under the Uniform Credentialing Act and engaged in the practice of medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine, pharmacy, optometry, podiatry, physical therapy, or nursing.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 112;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 786;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 144;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 686;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1301.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.